Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Department of  Revenue, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for  the following
purposes:
(1) Administration..........................  $ 37,630,667
(2) Property Tax Division ............... $ 20,902,700
(3) Personal Tax and Compliance
Division..................................... $ 62,494,777
(4) Business Division ...................... $ 22,902,302
(5) Collections Division................... $ 34,301,420
(6) Information Technology
Services Division....................... $ 45,431,040
(7) Debt service and
related costs ............................. $ 2,582,420
(8) Nonprofit housing program....... $ 3,639,677
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and re-
imbursements from federal service  agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds
not described in this section, collected or received by the Department  of Revenue, for the
following purposes:
(1) Administration.......................... $ 12,780,228
(2) Property Tax Division ............... $ 47,731,895
(3) Personal Tax and Compliance
Division..................................... $ 1,489,780
(4) Business Division ...................... $ 15,077,180
(5) Collections Division................... $ 18,701,173
(6) Corporate Division .................... $ 16,470,283
(7) Information Technology
Services Division....................... $ 13,750,320
(8) Marijuana program ................... $ 4,066,450
(9) Senior Property Tax
Enrolled House Bill 5034 (HB 5034-A) Page 1
Deferral program...................... $ 37,001,201
(10) Debt service and
related costs ............................. $ 113,110
SECTION 3. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Passed by House May 24, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5034 (HB 5034-A) Page 2